Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 12011 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Legislative committee” means any standing committee,


interim committee, select committee, subcommittee, or joint


committee of the Legislature duly authorized to conduct


investigations or oversight;


2. “Majority vote” means a vote in favor by more than fifty


percent (50%) of the total membership of the committee, excluding ex


officio members in the committee membership total unless they are


present and voting; and

Req. No. 3442 Page 1


3. “Subpoena” means a subpoena for the attendance of witnesses


or the production of documents, records, or other evidence.


B. In addition to the powers granted under Section 42 of


Article V of the Oklahoma Constitution, any legislative committee


shall have the power to issue subpoenas in furtherance of its


authorized investigative or oversight functions. A subpoena may be


authorized:


1. Upon a majority vote of the committee at any duly convened


meeting where a quorum is present. Upon authorization by majority


vote, the chair of the committee, or the vice chair in the absence


of the chair, shall issue and sign the subpoena on behalf of the


committee; or


2. Jointly by the chair and vice chair of the committee. Upon


joint authorization by the chair and vice chair, either the chair or


vice chair may issue and sign the subpoena.


C. Any rule of the Senate or House of Representatives in


conflict with the provisions of this section is hereby superseded to


the extent of such conflict.


D. Disobedience of a subpoena issued pursuant to this section,


or disorderly conduct in relation thereto, shall constitute contempt


punishable as provided in Section 42 of Article V of the Oklahoma


Constitution.





Req. No. 3442 Page 2


E. This section shall not limit the inherent powers of either


house of the Legislature or any other statutory authority related to


legislative investigations.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3442 BLB 1/15/2026 2:04:46 PM































Req. No. 3442 Page 3